Massachusetts, session 194th, H3727.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the portion of the 
Massachusetts Turnpike between Boston and Worcester shall be named “The Bill Russell and 
Bob Cousy Highway”. The Department of Transportation shall post appropriate signage to mark 
this.